test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-taryeTS_gt-norm.yaml
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тарˮ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: тартамзь
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: тартась
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: тарць
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: [тарˮнинзь, тарнинзь]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: тартинзь
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: тарканзь
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: [тарˮмаць, тармаць]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: тартаць
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тараць
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: [тарˮм, тарм]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: тал
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: [тарта, тартя]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: [тарˮмиʼ, тармиʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: талиʼ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: тартиʼ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: [тарˮмаˮ, тармаˮ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: талаˮ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: [тартоʼ, тартёʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: [тарˮмась, тармась]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: талась
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: [тартась, тартясь]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: [тарˮминзь, тарминзь]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: талинзь
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: тартинзь
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: [тарˮмаць, тармаць]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: талаць
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: [тартонзь, тартёнзь]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [таркаюн, таркюн]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [таркаюд, таркюд]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [таркаюда, таркюда]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [таркаюниʼ, таркюниʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [таркаюдиʼ, таркюдиʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [таркаюдиʼ, таркюдиʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [таркаюнаˮ, таркюнаˮ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [таркаюдаˮ, таркюдаˮ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [таркаюдоʼ, таркюдоʼ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [таркаюнась, таркюнась]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [таркаюдась, таркюдась]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [таркаюдась, таркюдась]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [таркаюнинзь, таркюнинзь]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [таркаюдинзь, таркюдинзь]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [таркаюдинзь, таркюдинзь]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [таркаюнаць, таркюнаць]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [таркаюдаць, таркюдаць]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [таркаюдонзь, таркюдонзь]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тарен
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: таред
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тареда
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тарениʼ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: таредиʼ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: таредиʼ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: таренаˮ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: таредаˮ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: таредоʼ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: таренась
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: таредась
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: таредась
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: таренинзь
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тарединзь
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тарединзь
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: таренаць
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: таредаць
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: таредонзь
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Tra: [тарˮӈэ, тарӈэ]
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Car: тарциˮ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Equ: тартремʼ
     тарˮ+Hom2+N+Equ+Lat: тартревʼ
